nl: Great Highland-doedelzak sierbeslagmateriaal: Messing; Goud; Imitatie-ivoor; Ivoor (indien legaal); Nikkel; Nieuwzilver; Plastic; Zilver; Roestvrij staal; Hout; Overig
ko: 그레이트 하이랜드 백파이프 마운트 재질: 황동; 금색; 모조 상아; 상아(합법인 경우); 니켈; 양백; 플라스틱; 은색; 스테인리스 스틸; 목재; 기타
vi: Vật liệu gắn kèn túi Great Highland: Đồng thau; Vàng; Ngà voi giả; Ngà voi (nơi hợp pháp); Niken; Bạc niken; Nhựa; Bạc; Thép không gỉ; Gỗ; Khác
ru: Материал декоративных накладок волынки Great Highland: Латунь; Золото; Искусственная слоновая кость; Слоновая кость (где разрешено); Никель; Нейзильбер; Пластик; Серебро; Нержавеющая сталь; Дерево; Другое
sk-SK: Montážny materiál pre škótske gajdy: Mosadz; Zlato; Imitácia slonoviny; Slonovina (kde je to legálne); Nikel; Nové striebro (alpaka); Plast; Striebro; Nerezová oceľ; Drevo; Iné
zh-CN: 苏格兰高地风笛固定件材质: 黄铜; 金; 仿象牙; 象牙（合法地区）; 镍; 白铜; 塑料; 银; 不锈钢; 木材; 其他
es: Material de montaje para la gran gaita de las Highlands: Latón; Oro; Imitación de marfil; Marfil (donde sea legal); Níquel; Alpaca; Plástico; Plata; Acero inoxidable; Madera; Otro
cs: Montážní materiál pro dudy Great Highland: Mosaz; Zlatá; Imitace slonoviny; Slonovina (kde je to legální); Nikl; Alpaka; Plast; Stříbro; Nerezová ocel; Dřevo; Ostatní
el: Υλικό διακοσμητικών στοιχείων στήριξης γκάιντας Great Highland: Ορείχαλκος; Χρυσό; Απομίμηση ελεφαντόδοντου; Ελεφαντόδοντο (όπου είναι νόμιμο); Νικέλιο; Νεάργυρος (αλπακάς); Πλαστικό; Ασήμι; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Ξύλο; Άλλο
nb: Monteringsmateriell for sekkepipe fra Great Highland: Messing; Gull; Imitert elfenben; Elfenben (der det er lovlig); Nikkel; Nysølv; Plast; Sølv; Rustfritt stål; Tre; Annet
th: วัสดุสำหรับติดตั้งปี่สก็อตไฮแลนด์: ทองเหลือง; สีทอง; งาช้างเทียม; งาช้าง (ในกรณีที่ถูกกฎหมาย); นิกเกิล; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; พลาสติก; เงิน; สเตนเลสสตีล; ไม้; อื่นๆ
de: Material der Zierbeschläge der Great Highland Bagpipes: Messing; Gold; Elfenbein-Imitat; Elfenbein (sofern legal); Nickel; Neusilber; Kunststoff; Silber; Edelstahl; Holz; Sonstige
fi: Great Highland ‑säkkipillin kiinnitysmateriaali: Messinki; Kulta; Jäljitelmänorsunluu; Norsunluu (missä laillista); Nikkeli; Uushopea; Muovi; Hopea; Ruostumaton teräs; Puu; Muu
hu: Great Highland duda szerelőanyag: Sárgaréz; Arany; Utánzatú elefántcsont; Elefántcsont (ahol engedélyezett); Nikkel; Alpakka; Műanyag; Ezüst; Rozsdamentes acél; Fa; Egyéb
da: Monteringsmateriale for Great Highland-sækkepibe: Messing; Guld; Imiteret elfenben; Elfenben (hvor det er lovligt); Nikkel; Nysølv; Plast; Sølv; Rustfrit stål; Træ; Andet
sl-SI: Okrasni material škotskih dud: Medenina; Zlato; Imitacija slonovine; Slonovina (kjer je zakonito); Nikelj; Novo srebro (alpaka); Plastika; Srebro; Nerjavno jeklo; Les; Drugo
lt-LT: Great Highland dūdmaišio apdailos medžiaga: Žalvaris; Auksas; Dramblio kaulo imitacija; Dramblio kaulas (kur tai legalu); Nikelis; Nikelio sidabras; Plastikas; Sidabras; Nerūdijantis plienas; Mediena; Kita
hr-HR: Materijal za montažu gajdi Great Highland: Mjed; Zlato; Imitacija bjelokosti; Bjelokost (tamo gdje je zakonito); Nikal; Novo srebro; Plastika; Srebro; Nehrđajući čelik; Drvo; Ostalo
pt-BR: Gaita de foles Great Highland material dos ornamentos: Latão; Ouro; Imitação de marfim; Marfim (onde permitido); Níquel; Alpaca; Plástico; Prata; Aço inoxidável; Madeira; Outro
fr: Matériau des montures de la grande cornemuse écossaise: Laiton; Or; Imitation ivoire; Ivoire (si légal); Nickel; Maillechort; Plastique; Argent; Acier inoxydable; Bois; Autre
pl: Materiał ozdobnych elementów dud Great Highland: Mosiądz; Złoto; Imitacja kości słoniowej; Kość słoniowa (tam, gdzie to legalne); Nikiel; Nowe srebro; Plastik; Srebro; Stal nierdzewna; Drewno; Inne
ro-RO: Material de montare pentru cimpoiurile din Great Highland: Alamă; Aur; Imitație de fildeș; Fildeș (unde este legal); Nichel; Nichel argintat; Plastic; Argint; Oțel inoxidabil; Lemn; Altele
sv: Material för dekorativa beslag på Great Highland-säckpipa: Mässing; Guld; Imitationselfenben; Elfenben (där det är lagligt); Nickel; Nysilver; Plast; Silver; Rostfritt stål; Trä; Övrigt
it: materiale di montaggio per cornamuse scozzesi: Ottone; Oro; Avorio sintetico; Avorio (ove legale); Nichel; Alpacca; Plastica; Argento; Acciaio inossidabile; Legno; Altro
bg-BG: Материал на декоративните елементи на гайда Great Highland: Месинг; Злато; Имитация на слонова кост; Слонова кост (където е законно); Никел; Алпака; Пластмаса; Сребро; Неръждаема стомана; Дърво; Друго
pt-PT: Material de montagem para gaitas de foles Great Highland: Latão; Ouro; Imitação de marfim; Marfim (onde for legal); Níquel; Alpaca; Plástico; Prata; Aço inoxidável; Madeira; Outro
zh-TW: 蘇格蘭高地風笛飾件材質: 黃銅; 金; 仿象牙; 象牙 (在合法地區); 鎳; 白銅; 塑膠; 銀; 不鏽鋼; 木材; 其他
en: Great Highland bagpipes mounting material: Brass; Gold; Imitation ivory; Ivory (where legal); Nickel; Nickel silver; Plastic; Silver; Stainless steel; Wood; Other
tr: Great Highland gaydası montaj malzemesi: Pirinç; Altın; Suni fildişi; Fildişi (yasal olduğu yerlerde); Nikel; Nikel gümüş; Plastik; Gümüş; Paslanmaz çelik; Ahşap; Diğer
ja: グレートハイランドバグパイプの取り付け素材: 真鍮; 金色; 模造象牙; 象牙 (合法な場合); ニッケル; 洋白; プラスチック; 銀色; ステンレススチール; 木材; その他